Florida, session 2026, SB382.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 35 36 Section 1.âEffective July 1, 2026, subsection (10) is added 37 to section 316.20655, Florida Statutes, to read: 38 316.20655âElectric bicycle regulations.â 39 (10)(a)âA person operating an electric bicycle on a shared 40 pathway that is not located adjacent to a roadway, including a 41 shared pathway located in a park or recreational area, shall 42 yield to pedestrians and shall give an audible signal before 43 overtaking and passing a pedestrian. 44 (b)âA person operating an electric bicycle on a sidewalk or 45 any other area designated for pedestrian use may not operate the 46 electric bicycle at a speed greater than 10 miles per hour if a 47 pedestrian is within 50 feet of the electric bicycle. 48 (c)âA person who fails to comply with this subsection 49 commits a noncriminal traffic infraction, punishable as a 50 nonmoving violation as provided in chapter 318. 51 Section 2.âMicromobility Device Safety Task Force.â 52 (1)âCREATION.âThe Micromobility Device Safety Task Force, a 53 task force as defined in s. 20.03(5), Florida Statutes, is 54 created adjunct to the Department of Highway Safety and Motor 55 Vehicles. The department shall provide administrative and staff 56 support services related to the functions of the task force. 57 (2)âPURPOSE.âThe purpose of the task force is to examine 58 and recommend improvements to state law and the regulatory 59 framework governing micromobility devices as defined in s. 60 316.003, Florida Statutes, in order to encourage the safe 61 operation of micromobility devices and to prevent traffic 62 incidents, injuries, and fatalities involving such devices. 63 (3)âMEMBERSHIP; MEETINGS.â 64 (a)âThe task force shall be composed of the executive 65 director of the Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles, 66 or his or her designee; the Secretary of Transportation, or his 67 or her designee; and the following members, who shall be 68 appointed by the executive director of the Department of Highway 69 Safety and Motor Vehicles: 70 1.âA representative from the Florida Sheriffs Association. 71 2.âA representative from the Florida Police Chiefs 72 Association. 73 3.âA representative from the micromobility device industry. 74 4.âA representative from the Florida League of Cities. 75 5.âA representative from the Florida Association of 76 Counties. 77 6.âA representative from the medical field with experience 78 in treating bicyclist and pedestrian injuries. 79 7.âA representative from an organization involved in 80 efforts to prevent injuries and fatalities involving 81 micromobility devices, including electric bicycles and motorized 82 scooters. 83 (b)âAppointments to the task force must be made within 15 84 days after this act becomes a law. 85 (c)âThe executive director of the Department of Highway 86 Safety and Motor Vehicles, or his or her designee, shall chair 87 the task force. Any vacancy on the task force must be filled in 88 the same manner as the original appointment. 89 (d)âThe task force shall convene no later than 30 days 90 after this act becomes a law. The task force shall meet at least 91 monthly, but may meet more frequently at the call of the chair. 92 At least one meeting of the task force must occur in each of the 93 following regions of the state: North Florida, Central Florida, 94 and South Florida. All meetings shall be held at the time and 95 place designated by the chair. 96 (e)âMembers of the task force shall serve without 97 compensation but are entitled to receive reimbursement for per 98 diem and travel expenses pursuant to s. 112.061, Florida 99 Statutes. 100 (4)âREPORT.âThe task force shall prepare a report that 101 includes legislative recommendations for improvements to state 102 law and the regulatory framework governing micromobility 103 devices. The report must take into account methods to improve 104 traffic safety for micromobility device operators and riders, 105 pedestrians, and other vehicle operators through reasonable 106 measures designed to reduce traffic incidents, injuries, and 107 fatalities. Before October 1, 2026, the task force shall submit 108 the report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the 109 Speaker of the House of Representatives. Upon submission of the 110 report, the task force shall expire. 111 Section 3.â(1)âBeginning 30 days after this act becomes a 112 law, the Florida Highway Patrol and each police department and 113 sheriffâs office shall maintain a list of all traffic crashes 114 that the respective agency investigates which involve a 115 micromobility device. Each micromobility device crash must be 116 included in the list, regardless of whether the crash is 117 reported on a Florida Traffic Crash Report, Long Form; short 118 form crash report; or driver exchange-of-information form. The 119 list must contain the following information for each traffic 120 crash involving a micromobility device: 121 (a)âDate and time of the crash. 122 (b)âIf applicable, the class of electric bicycle involved 123 in the crash. 124 (c)âAge of the micromobility device operator involved in 125 the crash. 126 (d)âIf known, whether the micromobility device operator 127 possessed a valid Florida learnerâs driver license or driver 128 license at the time of the crash. 129 (2)âBy October 15, 2026, each police department and 130 sheriffâs office shall submit a report to the Department of 131 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles which contains a list of all 132 micromobility device crashes investigated by the respective 133 police department or sheriffâs office from the beginning of the 134 reporting period through September 30, 2026. The report must be 135 submitted in a form and manner determined by the department. 136 (3)âBy October 31, 2026, the Department of Highway Safety 137 and Motor Vehicles shall submit to the Governor, the President 138 of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives a 139 report summarizing the reports submitted to the department 140 pursuant to subsection (2) and include in the report the list 141 maintained by the Florida Highway Patrol pursuant to subsection 142 (1). The report must separate the micromobility device crash 143 data by device type and county and list the reporting law 144 enforcement agencies within each county. 145 Section 4.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 146 act, this act shall take effect upon becoming a law.